Hawaii, session 2025, SB1585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that education and vocational training are the cornerstones of professional development for students seeking job opportunities and career development throughout the State.  The Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education advisory council and its associated members from the executive office on early learning, department of education, and university of Hawaii, including the university of Hawaii community colleges, collaborate to improve educational pathways from early childhood through higher education to imbue students with vocational skills and knowledge that will prepare them for careers and develop them as leaders within the community.  This cooperation is vital to foster economic growth and stability. The legislature further finds that longstanding vacancies within the state workforce have created challenges for state departments seeking to fill positions with qualified candidates.  Accordingly, the Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education aims to fulfill vocational needs for these departments.  To meet these goals, it is imperative that the P-20 partnerships for education work closely with state departments such as the department of labor and industrial relations; department of human resources development; department of business, economic development, and tourism; the university of Hawaii system, including the university of Hawaii community colleges; and the department of education. The legislature further finds that creating a performance metric to measure the development of P-20 partnerships for education programs will promote accountability in state spending, ensuring that state appropriations are used responsibly and efficiently toward meeting program initiatives. The legislature also finds that requiring the Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education office within the university of Hawaii to establish and implement evidence-based assessment of its workforce and pathway development programs is a matter of statewide concern pursuant to article X, section 6, of the Hawaii State Constitution. The purpose of this Act is to establish and implement evidence-based performance metrics for the Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education to allow better evidence-based assessments for its workforce and pathway development programs. SECTION 2. Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part     .  HAWAII P-20 PARTNERSHIPS FOR EDUCATION §304A- Hawaii P-20; performance metrics evaluation program; established. (a)  The Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education shall establish and implement evidence-based assessments of its workforce and pathway development programs for Hawaii students, as provided in this section. (b) The Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education shall create and maintain records of standardized performance metrics relating to the outcomes of its workforce and pathway development programs, including the number of students utilizing those pathways to fill to public sector job vacancies and vacancies in the State's private sector workforce. (c) The Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education advisory council shall work with the: (1)  Department of labor and industrial relations; (2)  Department of human resources development; (3)  Department of business, economic development, and tourism; (4)  University of Hawaii system, including the university of Hawaii community colleges; and (5)  Department of education, to develop the metrics and standards used to measure the performance-based outcomes required under this section to ensure alignment with the vocational and economic goals of the P-20 partnerships for education program. (d) Funds appropriated to P-20 partnerships for education may be transferred to other state departments or agencies in accordance with the performance-metrics and outcomes relating to student achievement, degree attainment, and the number or percentage of jobs in career paths that lead to living wage positions. (e) Any amount under subsection (d) that is not transferred to another program shall lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year. (f) No later than thirty days prior to the convening of each regular session, the Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education advisory council shall submit a report to the legislature that summarizes the evidence-based assessment of its workforce and pathway development programs under this section, including: (1)  The number of pathways created that connect students with emerging sector jobs, as identified by the department of business, economic development, and tourism; (2)  The number of job vacancies listed that are actual local jobs; (3)  The number of job vacancies listed that are vacancies in state government; and (4)  The number of job vacancies that have been filled by Hawaii students using the pathways developed by P-20 partnerships for education." SECTION 3. There is appropriated or authorized for expenditure out of the Perkins V federal funds received by the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii P-20 partnerships for education office to establish and implement evidence-based assessments of its workforce and pathway development programs. The sums appropriated or authorized shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2050.